fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Base-ball et softball > Softballs: Balles de softball à lancer rapide; Balles de softball à lancer lent
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Honkbal en softbal > Softbalballen: Fastpitch-softballen; Slowpitch-softballen
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Baseball og softball > Bolde til softball: Fastpitch-softballs; Slowpitch-softballs
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Baseball & Softball > Softballs: Fastpitch Softballs; Slow Pitch Softballs
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Beisebol e softbol > Softball: Bolas de fastpitch; Bolas de slow pitch
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 棒球/垒球用品 > 垒球: 快投垒球; 慢投垒球
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Baseball i softball > Softball: Piłki do fastpitch softballu; Piłki do slowpitch softballu
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Baseball a softball > Softbalové míčky: Softballové míče na fastpitch; Softballové míče na slow pitch
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Baseball și softball > Mingi de softball: Mingi de softball fastpitch; Mingi de softball slow pitch
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Бейзбол и софтбол > Топки за софтбол: Състезателни топки за софтбол; Топки за софтбол при бавен подаване
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Baseball in softball > Žoge za softball: Hitre žoge za fastball; Počasne žoge za softball
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Baseball e softball > Softball: Palle da fastpitch softball; Palle da slowpitch softball
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 棒球和壘球 > 壘球: 快速壘球; 慢速壘球
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Baseball ja softball > Softball-pallot: Fastpitch-softballpallot; Slow pitch -softballpallot
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Mπέιζμπολ/σόφτμπολ > Μπάλες σόφτμπολ: Μπάλες σόφτμπολ fastpitch; Μπάλες σόφτμπολ slow pitch
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Baseball & Softball > Softball-Bälle: Fastpitch-Softballs; Slowpitch-Softballs
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Bejzbol i softbol > Loptice za softbol: Fastpitch softbol; Softbol loptice za sporo bacanje
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng chày & Bóng mềm > Bóng mềm: Bóng mềm ném nhanh; Bóng mềm ném chậm
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Baseball és softball > Softballok: Fastpitch softball labdák; Slow pitch softball labdák
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Baseball och softball > Softballbollar: Softbollar för fastpitch; Softbollar för slow pitch
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Basebol e softbol > Bolas de softbol: Bolas de softbol de lançamento rápido; Bolas de softbol de lançamento lento
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 야구/소프트볼 > 소프트볼: 패스트피치 소프트볼; 슬로피치 소프트볼
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > เบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล > ซอฟท์บอล: ลูกซอฟต์บอลฟาสต์พิตช์; ลูกซอฟต์บอลสโลว์พิตช์
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Beisbolas ir softbolas > Softbolo kamuoliukai: Greitojo softbolo kamuoliai; Lėto metimo softbolo kamuoliukai
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Бейсбол и софтбол > Софтбольные мячи: Мячи для фастпитч-софтбола; Мячи для слоупитч-софтбола
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 野球・ソフトボール用品 > ソフトボール: ファストピッチ用ソフトボール; スローピッチ用ソフトボール
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Bejzbal a softbal > Softbalové lopty: Softbal Fastpitche; Softbaly s pomalým nadhadzovaním
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Béisbol y sóftbol > Pelotas de sóftbol: Pelotas de sóftbol de lanzamiento rápido; Pelotas de sóftbol de lanzamiento lento
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Beyzbol ve Softbol > Softball Topları: Hızlı atış softbol topları; Yavaş atış softbol topları
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Baseball og softball > Softballer: Softballer for fast-pitch; Softballer for slow-pitch